Indiana, session 2026, HB1115.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-21-5-8.5, AS AMENDED HEA 1152-2026,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) This section applies to all transfers of title
to property after June 30, 2015.
(b) The definitions in IC 32-25.5-2 apply in this section.
(c) As used in this section, "property" refers to real property covered
by the governing documents of a homeowners association.
(d) As used in this section, "purchaser" refers to a person who
purchases property.
(e) The following must be provided by the seller to a purchaser not
later than ten (10) days before the sale of the property closes:
(1) A disclosure that the property is in a community governed by
a homeowners association.
(2) A copy of the recorded governing documents.
(3) A statement indicating whether there are assessments and the
amount of any assessments.
(4) The following information about a board member,
homeowners association agent, or other person who has a contract
with the homeowners association to provide any management
services for the homeowners association:
(A) The name.
(B) The business or home address.
HEA 1115 — CC 1

2
(f) In the case of a resale or refinance of property subject to this
section, a homeowners association or agent of a homeowners
association providing a statement of unpaid assessments or other
charges of the homeowners association relating to the property may not
charge a fee more than fifty dollars ($50) for the statement.
(g) The failure to provide any of the documents listed in subsection
(e) does not limit or prevent enforcement of the governing documents
by the homeowners association.
SECTION 2. IC 32-25.5-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.27-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to subsection (b), this article applies
to the following:
(1) A homeowners association established after June 30, 2009,
that is authorized to impose mandatory dues on the homeowners
association's members.
(2) A homeowners association established before July 1, 2009:
(A) if a majority of the members of the homeowners
association elect to be governed by this article; or
(B) if the number of members required by the homeowners
association's governing documents elect to be governed by this
article if a different number of members other than the number
established in clause (A) is required by the governing
documents.
(b) The following apply to all homeowners associations, including
a homeowners association described in subsection (a)(2), regardless of
whether the members of the homeowners association have elected
under subsection (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) to be governed by this article:
(1) IC 32-25.5-3-2(c).
(1) (2) IC 32-25.5-3-3(g) IC 32-25.5-3-3(e) through
IC 32-25.5-3-3(m). IC 32-25.5-3-3(o).
(2) (3) IC 32-25.5-3-9.
(3) (4) IC 32-25.5-3-10.
(4) (5) IC 32-25.5-3-11.
(6) IC 32-25.5-3-12.
(5) (7) IC 32-25.5-4.
(6) (8) IC 32-25.5-5.
SECTION 3. IC 32-25.5-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2010,
SECTION 128, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) In addition to any other
meeting held by a board, a board shall hold a special meeting of the
members of a homeowners association if at least ten percent (10%) of
the members of the homeowners association submit to the board at
HEA 1115 — CC 1

3
least one (1) written demand for the special meeting that:
(1) describes the purpose for which the meeting is to be held; and
(2) is signed by the members requesting the special meeting.
(b) If a board does not send out a notice of the date, time, and place
for a special meeting not more than thirty (30) days after the date the
board receives a valid written demand for the special meeting under
subsection (a), a member of the homeowners association who signed
the written demand may:
(1) set the date, time, and place for the special meeting; and
(2) send out the notice for the special meeting to the other
members.
(c) In the meeting notice of the board's annual meeting, the
board shall include a written statement that:
(1) notifies homeowners association members of the right to
demand a special meeting of the members under this section;
and
(2) states the number of members required to demand a
special meeting, as determined under subsection (a);
in accordance with section 3(g) of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 32-25.5-3-3, AS AMENDED HEA 1152-2026,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A homeowners association shall prepare an
annual budget.
(b) The annual budget must reflect:
(1) the estimated revenues and expenses for the budget year; and
(2) the estimated surplus or deficit as of the end of the current
budget year.
(c) The homeowners association shall provide each member of the
homeowners association with:
(1) a:
(A) copy of the proposed annual budget; or
(B) written notice that a copy of the proposed annual budget
is available upon request at no charge to the member; and
(2) a written notice of the amount of any increase or decrease in
a regular annual assessment paid by the members that would
occur if the proposed annual budget is approved;
before the homeowners association meeting held under subsection (d).
(d) Subject to subsection (f) and section 3.1 of this chapter, a
homeowners association budget must be approved at a meeting of the
homeowners association members by a majority of the members of the
homeowners association in attendance at a meeting called and
conducted in accordance with the requirements of the homeowners
HEA 1115 — CC 1

4
association's governing documents.
(e) For purposes of this section, a member of a homeowners
association is considered to be in attendance at a meeting if the
member attends:
(1) in person;
(2) by proxy; or
(3) by remote or virtual means in accordance with the
procedures set forth in IC 23-17-10-1(d) through
IC 23-17-10-1(f); or
(3) (4) by any other means allowed under:
(A) state law; or
(B) the governing documents of the homeowners association.
(f) Except as provided in sections 3.1, 3.2, and 3.3 of this chapter,
if the number of members of the homeowners association in attendance
at a meeting held under subsection (d) does not constitute a quorum as
defined in the governing documents of the homeowners association, the
board may adopt an annual budget for the homeowners association for
the ensuing year in an amount that does not exceed one hundred
percent (100%) of the amount of the last approved homeowners
association annual budget.
(g) Subject to subsection (k):
(1) the financial records, including all contracts, invoices, bills,
receipts, and bank records, of a homeowners association must be
available for inspection by each member of the homeowners
association upon written request; and
(2) the minutes of meetings of the homeowners association board,
including the annual meeting, must be available to a member of
the homeowners association for inspection upon the homeowners
association member's request, which may be submitted:
(A) in person;
(B) in writing; or
(C) by electronic mail or other electronic means.
In addition to the right to inspect the meeting minutes of the
homeowners association board, a member of a homeowners
association has the right to attend any meeting of the homeowners
association board, including an annual meeting of the board. For
each meeting of the homeowners association board, the board
must provide at least four (4) days advance written notice of
the meeting to members of the homeowners association. The
meeting notice must include an agenda for the meeting. The
meeting notice for the annual meeting of the board must also
include a statement of the right of homeowners association
HEA 1115 — CC 1

5
members to demand a special meeting of the members under
section 2 of this chapter, including a statement of the number
of members required to demand a special meeting, as
determined under section 2(a) of this chapter. The board may
provide a written meeting notice required under this
subsection by hand delivery, United States mail, or electronic
mail or other electronic means. However, the board of directors
may meet in private to discuss delinquent assessments. The board
of directors may also meet in private with legal counsel to discuss
the initiation of litigation or to discuss litigation that either is
pending or has been threatened specifically in writing. As used in
this subsection, "litigation" includes any judicial action or
administrative law proceeding under state or federal law.
A written request for inspection must identify with reasonable
particularity the information being requested. A member's ability to
inspect records under this section shall not be unreasonably denied or
conditioned upon provision of an appropriate purpose for the request.
The homeowners association may not charge a fee for the copying of
a record requested under this subsection if the homeowners association
member requests a written copy of the record.
(h) Subject to subsections (j) and (k), if there is a dispute between
a homeowner and a homeowners association, the officers of the
homeowners association must make all communications concerning the
dispute available to the homeowner.
(i) Subject to subsections (j) and (k), the following apply:
(1) A homeowners association shall make all communications and
information concerning a lot available to the owner of the lot or
a home on the lot.
(2) If a homeowners association initiates communication with any
member about another member's lot, the homeowners association
must give a copy of that communication to the other member
whose lot is the subject of the communication. However, this
subdivision does not apply if the communication concerns
suspected criminal activity, or activity that is the subject of a law
enforcement investigation, involving the member whose lot is the
subject of the communication.
(j) A homeowners association is not required to make:
(1) communications between the homeowners association and the
legal counsel of the homeowners association; and
(2) other communications or attorney work product prepared in
anticipation of litigation;
available to the owner of a lot or home.
HEA 1115 — CC 1

6
(k) A homeowners association is not required to make available to
a member for inspection any of the following:
(1) Unexecuted contracts.
(2) Records regarding contract negotiations.
(3) Information regarding an individual member's association
account to a person who is not a named party on the account.
(4) Any information that is prohibited from release under state or
federal law.
(5) Any records that were created more than two (2) years before
the request.
(6) Information that:
(A) is provided by a member of the homeowners association
about another member of the homeowners association; and
(B) concerns suspected criminal activity involving the other
member.
Except as otherwise provided in this article (including subsection (j)
and this subsection), other applicable law, or the governing documents
of the homeowners association, a homeowners association is not
required to retain a record of a written or electronic communication for
any specific period of time. However, a homeowners association or a
member of the board of a homeowners association shall retain for at
least two (2) years after receipt, the date it is received or sent, and
during that period shall make available to a member of the homeowners
association at the member's request, any written or electronic
communication received or sent by the homeowners association or
board member that relates to a financial transaction of the homeowners
association and that is not otherwise excepted from disclosure under
this article or other applicable law.
(l) Except for information described in subsection (k)(4), nothing
in this chapter:
(1) abrogates or eliminates provisions in homeowners association
agreements that permit or require additional disclosure or
inspection rights not required by this chapter; or
(2) prevents a homeowners association from agreeing to make
disclosures or to provide inspection rights not required by this
chapter.
(m) A homeowners association may not charge a fee to search for
a record in response to a written request submitted under this chapter.
(n) Notwithstanding any other law, a homeowners association, an
agent of a homeowners association, or a homeowners association
management company may not charge a homeowner a fee associated
with any service services that are included in the homeowner's
HEA 1115 — CC 1

7
association assessment and provided by the homeowners association,
other than agent of the homeowners association, or homeowners
association management company, including services related to:
(1) waste management for common areas;
(2) maintenance of common areas;
(3) landscaping of common areas;
(4) maintenance of common amenities;
(5) security for the subdivision; or
(6) administrative duties.
This subsection does not prohibit a homeowners association, an
agent of a homeowners association, or a homeowners association
management company from charging a homeowner a fee for any
optional service that is offered to a homeowner in connection with
the homeowner's individual lot, parcel, tract, unit, or interest in the
subdivision and that the homeowner opts to receive from the
homeowners association, agent of the homeowners association, or
homeowners association management company. However, any
service that is included in a homeowners association assessment
may not be reclassified as an optional service and charged as a
separate fee unless such reclassification is approved by a majority
of the members of the homeowners association in attendance at a
meeting (as determined under subsection (e)) called and conducted
in accordance with the requirements of the homeowners
association's governing documents. A schedule of any optional
services offered by the homeowners association, an agent of the
homeowners association, or a homeowners association
management company must be approved by the board and
distributed to members of the homeowners association on at least
an annual basis and whenever there is a change in the fees for any
of the offered services. The amount of any unpaid fee for an
optional service provided to a homeowner under this subsection
does not constitute a lien against the homeowner's property. This
subsection does not abrogate or limit the authority of a
homeowners association to charge or collect the homeowners
association dues assessments or fines expressly identified in the
homeowners association's governing documents. This subsection does
not affect the ability of a homeowners association, an agent of a
homeowners association, or a homeowners association
management company to take debt collection efforts for dues
assessments, fees for optional services, or fines allowable under the
homeowners association's governing documents.
(o) Notwithstanding any other law, a homeowners association,
HEA 1115 — CC 1

8
an agent of a homeowners association, or a homeowners
association management company may not charge a homeowner a
fee associated with the production of a statement of account setting
forth the amount of any unpaid assessments or other charges due
and owing from the homeowner. An account statement must be
maintained by the homeowners association or its agent, and must
be provided to a homeowner upon request.
SECTION 5. IC 32-25.5-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2016,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The governing documents must contain a
provision allowing the owners to amend the governing documents at
any time, from time to time, subject to the following:
(1) The declarant's consent to an amendment may be required if:
(A) the declarant owns one (1) or more units within the
subdivision; and
(B) not more than seven (7) years have passed since the
original governing documents were first recorded.
(2) The consent of the owners to the amendment has been
obtained as evidenced by either of the following:
(A) The vote of the owners at a meeting duly called for the
purpose of considering the amendment, including a special
meeting called upon the demand of members of the
homeowners association under section 2 of this chapter.
(B) A written instrument signed by the owners.
The governing documents may not require that the consent of
more than seventy-five percent (75%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
owners is be required for consent under this subdivision.
(3) If the consent of first mortgage holders is required, only first
mortgage holders that provide an address to the secretary of the
board must be notified. The consent of a first mortgage holder
must be indicated in a written instrument signed by the mortgage
holder. However, a mortgage holder is considered to have
consented to a proposed amendment if the mortgage holder does
not respond to a written request for consent within thirty (30) days
after the mortgage holder receives the request. The governing
documents may not require that the consent of more than
seventy-five percent (75%) two-thirds (2/3) of first mortgage
holders eligible to receive notice is be required for consent under
this subdivision.
(4) Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) through (3), the governing
documents may require the approval of at least ninety-five percent
(95%) of the owners to convey common areas or to dissolve the
HEA 1115 — CC 1

9
plan of governance for the homeowners association.
(b) A homeowners association or the board may not enforce a
provision of the governing documents that conflicts with this
section.
SECTION 6. IC 32-25.5-3-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) A homeowners association
may assess a fine for a member's violation of a covenant described
in IC 32-25.5-2-3(2) if the board first adopts a schedule of fines that
sets forth:
(1) the covenant violations that are subject to a fine;
(2) the amount of the fine that applies to each violation
identified under subdivision (1);
(3) if any of the fines listed in subdivision (2) will be assessed
on an ongoing or recurring basis:
(A) for a defined period or a specified number of days; or
(B) until the violation is cured or another contingency
occurs;
a statement of that fact, along with a description of how the
fine will be calculated and assessed; and
(4) a maximum aggregate fine amount for any single violation.
A fine assessed on an ongoing or recurring basis may not
exceed the maximum aggregate amount stated in the schedule
of fines.
(b) If the board will adopt a schedule of fines under this section
at a meeting of the board, the board shall give notice of the meeting
to members in accordance with the homeowners association's
governing documents. The notice must include the proposed
schedule of fines.
(c) A schedule of fines adopted under this section must be
available to any member for inspection upon the member's request,
which may be submitted:
(1) in person;
(2) in writing; or
(3) by electronic mail or other electronic means.
(d) The board may, from time to time, amend or repeal a
schedule of fines adopted under this section if notice of:
(1) the amendment or repeal, including the amended schedule
of fines in the case of an amendment; and
(2) any meeting held to adopt the amendment or repeal;
is given to members in accordance with the homeowners
association's governing documents.
HEA 1115 — CC 1

10
(e) Members may submit to the board under section 2 of this
chapter a written demand for a special meeting of the members of
the homeowners association for the purpose of voting to amend a
schedule of fines adopted under this section. An amended schedule
of fines shall be:
(1) adopted as proposed; or
(2) revised and adopted;
if so approved by a majority of members present at the meeting.
(f) After a schedule of fines has been adopted under this section,
the board may assess a member a fine for a violation included in
the schedule of fines under subsection (a)(1) if the board first
provides notice to the member of:
(1) the violation for which the fine will be assessed;
(2) the amount of the fine;
(3) the date on which the fine will be assessed; and
(4) if the fine will be assessed on an ongoing or recurring
basis:
(A) for a defined period or a specified number of days; or
(B) until the violation is cured or another contingency
occurs;
a statement of that fact, along with a description of how the
fine will be calculated and assessed.
(g) If a member is assessed a fine under this section, the amount
of the fine that has accrued must be available to the member upon
the member's request, which may be submitted:
(1) in person;
(2) in writing; or
(3) by electronic mail or other electronic means.
(h) The assessment of a fine by a homeowners association under
this section does not operate as a waiver of the homeowners
association's rights to pursue alternative remedies provided for in
the homeowners association's governing documents, including any
right to injunctive relief or to pursue a claim for damages.
SECTION 7. IC 32-25.5-5-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.141-2015,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "exempt claim" refers
to any of the following claims or actions:
(1) A claim by the homeowners association for assessments or
dues and any action by the association to collect assessments or
dues. This subdivision does not include a claim that involves
the assessment or enforcement of a fine under IC 32-25.5-3-12
by a homeowners association for a member's violation of a
HEA 1115 — CC 1

11
covenant of the homeowners association.
(2) An action by a party to obtain a temporary restraining order or
equivalent emergency equitable relief:
(A) to maintain the status quo and preserve the party's ability
to enforce the governing documents; or
(B) when an emergency condition exists that jeopardizes the
health or safety of any of the residents within the community
governed by the homeowners association.
(3) A suit to which an applicable statute of limitations would
expire within the notice period. This subdivision does not apply
if a party against which the claim is made agrees to toll the statute
of limitations as to the claim for the period reasonably necessary
to comply with this chapter.
(4) A dispute that is subject to mediation, arbitration, or other
alternate dispute resolution under applicable law, contract,
warranty agreement, or other instrument.
(5) A claim that is substantively identical to a claim:
(A) that was previously addressed by the parties; or
(B) that was resolved by a judicial determination in favor of
one (1) of the parties.
SECTION 8. IC 32-25.5-5-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.141-2015,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. A claimant must provide notice of the claim
to the respondent, stating plainly and concisely the following
information:
(1) The nature of the claim, including the date, time, location,
persons involved, and the respondent's role in the claim.
(2) The basis of the claim, including the provision of the
governing documents or other authority out of which the claim
arises.
(3) What the claimant wants the respondent to do or not to do to
resolve the claim.
(4) That the respondent has a right to meet with the claimant, if
the respondent makes a written request for a meeting not later
than ten (10) business days after the date of the notice.
(5) The name and address of the person from whom the
respondent must contact to:
(A) request a meeting under subdivision (4); or
(B) provide notice that the violation on which the claim is
based has been cured.
HEA 1115 — CC 1

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1115 — CC 1